th: รูปแบบที่รองลูกธนู: แบบใบมีด; แบบประคอง/Whisker Biscuit; แบบหลบ (ควบคุมด้วยสายเคเบิล); แบบหลบ (ควบคุมด้วยลิ้มบ์); ลอนเชอร์; ปุ่มสปริง/พลันเจอร์; แบบง่าม; ชั้นวาง; แบบยิงผ่าน; แบบติดคงที่; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Stilul suportului pentru săgeți: Lamă; Reținere/Whisker Biscuit; Drop-away (acționat prin cablu); Drop-away (acționat prin braț); Lansator; Presiune/Piston; Furcă; Suport arc; Shoot-through; Static adeziv; Altele
nl: Stijl pijloplegger: Blad; Omsluitend/Whisker Biscuit; Valsteun (kabel-aangedreven); Valsteun (werparm-aangedreven); Launcher; Druk/Plunger (Button); Vork; Plankje; Shoot-through; Statisch (plak); Overige
sk-SK: Štýl opierky šípu: Čepeľ; Obopínacie/Whisker Biscuit; Padacie (riadené káblom); Padacie (riadené ramenom); Vypúšťač; Tlakové/Plunger; Vidlicové; Polica; Prestreliteľné; Statické nalepovacie; Iné
hr-HR: Stil oslonca za strijele: Oštrica; Zatvoreni / Whisker Biscuit; Padajući (upravljan kabelom); Padajući (upravljan krakom); Bacač; Potisni gumb (plunger); Rogovi (prong); Polica; Prolazni; Statični na lijepljenje; Ostalo
pt-BR: Estilo de apoio da flecha: Lâmina; Contenção/Whisker Biscuit; Drop-away (acionado por cabo); Drop-away (acionado por lâmina); Lançador; Pressão/Plunger; Garfo; Prateleira; Shoot-through; Estático colável; Outro
hu: Nyílpárnastílus: Pengés; Zárt/Kefés (Whisker Biscuit); Lecsapódó (kábelvezérelt); Lecsapódó (karvezérelt); Kifutós; Nyomógombos (Plunger); Villás; Kifutópolc; Átlövős; Statikus felragasztható; Egyéb
zh-CN: 箭托样式: 钢片箭台; 包覆式/毛刷箭台; 跌落式（缆绳驱动）; 跌落式（弓片驱动）; 叉式箭台; 侧垫; 叉式; 搭台式; 穿透式; 静态粘贴式; 其他
ko: 애로우 레스트 유형: 블레이드; 컨테인먼트/위스커 비스킷; 드롭 어웨이(케이블 구동); 드롭 어웨이(림 구동); 런처; 프레셔/플런저; 프롱; 선반; 슛스루; 고정 부착식; 기타
da: Pilerests stil: Klinge; Fastholdelse/Whisker Biscuit; Drop-away (kabeldrevet); Drop-away (buebensdrevet); Launcher; Plunger; Grenet; Hylde; Shoot-through; Statisk stick-on; Andet
de: Bauart der Pfeilauflage: Blade; Containment/Whisker Biscuit; Drop-Away (kabelgesteuert); Drop-Away (wurfarmgesteuert); Launcher; Druckbutton/Plunger; Prong; Shelf; Shoot-Through; Statisch (zum Aufkleben); Sonstige
zh-TW: 箭架樣式: 刀片式; 包覆式/毛刷式; 起落式 (纜線驅動); 起落式 (弓臂驅動); 發射器式; 側墊/柱塞式; 叉式; 弓窗式; 穿透式; 靜態黏貼式; 其他
fr: Style de repose-flèche: Lame; Maintien/Whisker Biscuit; Escamotable (à câble); Escamotable (par branches); Lanceur; Pression/plongeur; À fourche; Tapis; Shoot-through; Statique à coller; Autre
ja: 矢RESTスタイル: ブレード; コンテインメント・ウィスカービスケット; ドロップアウェイ (ケーブル連動); ドロップアウェイ (リム連動); ランチャー; プレッシャー・プランジャー; プロング; シェルフ; シュートスルー; スタティックスティックオン; その他
es: Estilo del reposaflechas: Lámina; De contención/Whisker Biscuit; De caída (accionado por cable); De caída (accionado por pala); Lanzador; Botón de presión/Plunger; Clavija; Repisa; De paso; Estático adhesivo; Otro
en: Arrow rest style: Blade; Containment/Whisker Biscuit; Drop-away (cable-driven); Drop-away (limb-driven); Launcher; Pressure/Plunger; Prong; Shelf; Shoot-through; Static stick-on; Other
fi: Nuolihyllyn malli: Kielihylly; Suljettu / Whisker Biscuit; Vetäytyvä (kaapeliohjattu); Vetäytyvä (lapaohjattu); Laukaisinhylly; Painenappi/Plunger; Haarukka; Hylly; Läpiammuttava; Staattinen liimattava; Muu
sl-SI: Slog resta puščice: Z lamelo; Zadrževalni (Whisker Biscuit); Padajoči (kabelski); Padajoči (povezan s krakom); Izstrelitveni; Potisni (plunger); Z roglji; Polica; Prehodni (shoot-through); Statični na lepilo; Drugo
ru: Тип упора для стрелы: Полочка с лезвием; С удержанием / Whisker Biscuit; Падающая (от троса); Падающая (от плеча); Полочка с усиками; Плунжер; Рогатка; Классическая полка; Сквозная (Shoot-through); Статическая наклеиваемая; Другое
el: Στυλ στηρίγματος βέλους: Λεπίδα; Συγκράτηση/Whisker Biscuit; Drop-away (με καλώδιο); Drop-away (από τα άκρα); Εκτοξευτής; Πίεση/Έμβολο; Δίχαλο; Ράφι; Shoot-through; Στατικό αυτοκόλλητο; Άλλο
sv: Pilstödets stil: Blad; Inneslutande/Whisker Biscuit; Fallande (kabeldriven); Fallande (lemdriven); Launcher; Tryck/Plunger; Gaffel; Hylla; Shoot-through; Självhäftande, fast; Annat
tr: Ok yatağı stili: Yaprak; Kavramalı/Fırçalı; Düşer yatak (kablo tahrikli); Düşer yatak (kanat tahrikli); Fırlatıcı; Basınç/Piston; Çatal; Raf; İçinden atışlı; Sabit yapıştırmalı; Diğer
cs: Typ zakládky šípu: Čepelková; Uzavřená / Whisker Biscuit; Padací (ovládaná kabelem); Padací (ovládaná ramenem); Vidlicová; Odpružená opěrka / button; Dvouhrotá; Z police (shelf); Průstřelná; Nalepovací statická; Ostatní
lt-LT: Strėlės atramos stilius: Plokštelinis; Prilaikomasis / su šepetėliais; Atmetamas (valdomas trosu); Atmetamas (valdomas šaka); Svertinis; Slėginis / plunžerinis; Dvišakis; Lentynėlės tipo; Praskrodžiamasis; Statinis klijuojamas; Kita
bg-BG: Стил поставката на стрелата: Острие; Задържаща/Whisker Biscuit; Падаща (задвижвана от кабел); Падаща (задвижвана от рамото); Launcher; С натиск/Плунжер; Вилка; Рафт; Shoot-through; Статична за залепване; Друго
vi: Kiểu giá đỡ mũi tên: Lưỡi gạt; Có vòng giữ/Whisker Biscuit; Tự rớt (dẫn động bằng cáp); Tự rớt (dẫn động bằng cánh cung); Máng đỡ; Áp suất/Pít-tông; Ngạnh; Kệ đỡ; Bắn xuyên qua; Dán tĩnh; Khác
nb: Pil REST stil: Blad; Innkapsling / Whisker Biscuit; Fallhylle (kabeldrevet); Fallhylle (lemmedrevet); Bæregaffel; Trykk/plunger; Gaffel; Hylle; Gjennomskyting; Statisk klebe-på; Annet
it: Stile del REST per freccia: A lamella; A contenimento/Whisker Biscuit; Drop-away (azionato a cavo); Drop-away (azionato a flettente); A bilanciere; A pressione/Bottone di pressione; A rebbi; Mensola; Shoot-through; Statico adesivo; Altro
pl: Styl podstawki pod strzałę: Blaszana (blade); Zamknięta / Whisker Biscuit; Opadająca (zintegrowana z kablem); Opadająca (zintegrowana z ramieniem); Z ramieniem (launcher); Z buttonem (plunger); Widełkowa (prong); Półka; Shoot-through; Statyczna przyklejana; Inne
pt-PT: Estilo de descanso da flecha: Lâmina; Contenção/Whisker Biscuit; Queda livre (acionado por cabo); Queda livre (acionado por lâmina); Lançador; Pressão/Êmbolo; Dente; Prateleira; Shoot-through; Estático autocolante; Outros